Colorado, session 2026A, SB161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Cannabis Consumer Protection Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Marijuana products intended for human consumption present
public health and consumer safety considerations that warrant clear,
consistent, and effective state oversight;
(b) Regulation and taxation of marijuana products should reflect
public health risk and promote informed consumer choice;
(c) Since the legalization of marijuana, the marketplace has
evolved to include higher-potency products and more complex methods
of production and consumption, requiring updates to the state's regulatory
framework;
(d) Health and safety oversight of consumable products in
Colorado is appropriately placed within the agency possessing public
health, laboratory, and scientific expertise, which agency is the Colorado
department of public health and environment that currently oversees
similar functions for hemp and natural medicine;
(e) The marijuana enforcement division within the department of
revenue has, in recent years, faced fiscal and operational constraints while
administering an expanding scope of responsibilities; and
(f) It is appropriate to place responsibility for testing, product
safety standards, and oversight of the manufacturing of marijuana
products intended for human consumption within the Colorado
-3- SB26-161

department of public health and environment, while allowing the
marijuana enforcement division to focus on licensing, tax compliance,
and enforcement.
(2) In anticipation of future federal regulation of marijuana, the
general assembly intends to align Colorado's marijuana regulatory
structure with established regulatory models used for other agricultural
and consumer products, and this structure includes the separation of
licensing and enforcement functions from health and safety oversight.
(3) The general assembly further intends that this act enhance
consumer protection, ensure that marijuana products offered for sale in
Colorado meet applicable safety and labeling standards, disincentivize the
abuse of intoxicating cannabinoids by directly taxing intoxicating
cannabinoid content, and establish a regulatory framework that prioritizes
public health and safety.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-3-211 as
follows:
2-3-211. Marijuana tax revenue stabilization - legislative
council staff - definition - repeal.
(1) (a) AS PART OF THE QUARTERLY 2026 DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL PROJECT:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE THAT WILL BE RAISED IF TAXES
ARE IMPOSED IN THE NEXT CALENDAR YEAR AT THE RATES DESCRIBED IN
SECTIONS 39-28.8-202 (4)(b) AND 39-28.8-302 (1)(d); AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN
GENERATED AS A RESULT OF THE TAXES DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
39-28.8-202 (1) AND 39-28.8-302 (1)(a) IF THE TAXES WERE IMPOSED AT
THE SAME RATE AND IN THE SAME MANNER AS THEY WERE IMPOSED ON
-4- SB26-161

DECEMBER 31, 2025.
(b) IF THE AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION IS SUBSTANTIALLY DIFFERENT THAN THE
AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL PROPOSE ADJUSTMENTS TO
THE TAX RATES OF THE TAXES IMPOSED IN SECTION 39-28.8-202 (4)(b) TO
STABILIZE THE REVENUE FROM THE TAXES IMPOSED IN SECTIONS
39-28.8-202 AND 39-28.8-302. THE PROPOSED RATES MUST:
(I) EACH BE LESS THAN THE MAXIMUM RATES DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 39-28.8-202 (4)(a);
(II) FOR EACH TYPE OF RETAIL MARIJUANA OR RETAIL MARIJUANA
PRODUCT, BE IN SUBSTANTIALLY THE SAME PROPORTIONS AS THE RATES
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-28.8-202 (4)(b); AND
(III) BE PROJECTED BY LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF TO RESULT IN
THE AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF
THIS SECTION EQUALING THE AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(IV) BE ADJUSTED TO ACCOUNT FOR INFLATION OR DEFLATION
AND POPULATION GROWTH OR SHRINKAGE.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (1) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(2) (a) AS PART OF THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST, BEGINNING WITH THE 2027 QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL PROJECT THE AMOUNT OF
TAX REVENUE THAT WILL BE RAISED IF TAXES ARE IMPOSED IN THE NEXT
CALENDAR YEAR AT THE RATES DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 39-28.8-202
(4)(b) AND 39-28.8-302 (1)(d).
(b) TO ENSURE THAT THE TAX REVENUE FROM THE TAXES IMPOSED
-5- SB26-161

IN SECTIONS 39-28.8-202 (4)(b) AND 39-28.8-302 (1)(d) IS NOT
SIGNIFICANTLY HIGHER OR LOWER THAN THE AVERAGE TAX REVENUE
OVER THE PREVIOUS THREE YEARS, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF MAY
PROPOSE, TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, ADJUSTMENTS TO THE TAX
RATES OF THE TAXES IMPOSED IN SECTION 39-28.8-202 (4)(b) TO
STABILIZE THE REVENUE FROM THE TAXES IMPOSED IN SECTIONS
39-28.8-202 AND 39-28.8-302. THE PROPOSED RATES MUST:
(I) EACH BE LESS THAN THE MAXIMUM RATES DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 39-28.8-202 (4)(a); AND
(II) BE ADJUSTED TO ACCOUNT FOR INFLATION OR DEFLATION AND
POPULATION GROWTH OR SHRINKAGE.
(3) (a) IF LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF PROPOSES RATES PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OR (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
STAFF SHALL PRESENT THOSE PROPOSED RATES TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE ALONG WITH THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST. THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE MAY INTRODUCE LEGISLATION
TO ADJUST THE TAX RATES IN SECTION 39-28.8-202 (4)(b) TO STABILIZE
THE REVENUE FROM THE TAXES IMPOSED IN SECTIONS 39-28.8-202 AND
39-28.8-302.
(b) LEGISLATION INTRODUCED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS
GOVERNED BY THE RULES REGARDING LEGISLATION RECOMMENDED BY AN
INTERIM LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE FOR PURPOSES OF INTRODUCTION
DEADLINES OR BILL LIMITATIONS IMPOSED BY THE JOINT RULES OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(4) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, "INFLATION OR DEFLATION" MEANS
THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE INCREASE OR DECREASE IN THE UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR'S BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS CONSUMER PRICE
-6- SB26-161

INDEX, OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX, FOR DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD FOR
ALL ITEMS PAID FOR BY URBAN CONSUMERS.
(5) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2030.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-101, amend
(1.5); and add (4.4), (4.5), and (4.6) as follows:
39-28.8-101. Definitions - repeal.
Unless the context otherwise requires, any terms not defined in this
article 28.8 have the meanings set forth in article 26 of this title 39. As
used in this article 28.8, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.5) (a) "Average market rate" means the average price, as
determined by the department on a quarterly basis, of all unprocessed
retail marijuana that is sold or transferred from retail marijuana
cultivation facilities in the state to retail marijuana product manufacturing
facilities or retail marijuana stores, less taxes paid on the sales or
transfers. An "average market rate" may be based on the purchaser or
transferee of unprocessed retail marijuana or on the nature of the
unprocessed retail marijuana that is sold or transferred. The "average
market rate" must include one or more rates that cover unprocessed
marijuana that is allocated to extractions, and the initial rates for these
product types must be lower than the rate for unprocessed marijuana that
is allocated for direct sale to consumers.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (1.5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2027.
(4.4) "INFLATION" MEANS THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE INCREASE IN
THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR'S BUREAU OF LABOR
STATISTICS CONSUMER PRICE INDEX, OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX, FOR
DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD FOR ALL ITEMS PAID FOR BY URBAN
-7- SB26-161

CONSUMERS.
(4.5) "INTOXICATING CANNABINOID" MEANS:
(a) TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL; OR
(b) THE CHEMICALS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-5-427 (4)(d)(I)(A)
TO (4)(d)(I)(M).
(4.6) "INTOXICATING CANNABIS" MEANS A PRODUCT OR PLANT
MATERIAL THAT CONTAINS AN INTOXICATING CANNABINOID.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-202, amend
(1)(a)(I); repeal (1)(b); and add (4) as follows:
39-28.8-202. Retail marijuana sales tax - rules - definition.
(1) (a) (I) In addition to the tax imposed pursuant to part 1 of
article 26 of this title 39 and the sales tax imposed by a local government
pursuant to title 29, 30, 31, or 32, but except as otherwise set forth in
subsections (1)(a)(II) and (1)(a)(III) of this section, beginning January 1,
2014, and through June 30, 2017, there is imposed upon all sales of retail
marijuana and retail marijuana products by a retailer a tax at the rate of
ten percent of the amount of the sale. Beginning July 1, 2017, AND PRIOR
TO JANUARY 1, 2027, there is imposed upon all sales of retail marijuana
and retail marijuana products by a retailer a tax at the rate of fifteen
percent of the amount of the sale. The tax imposed by this section is
computed in accordance with schedules or forms prescribed by the
executive director of the department; except that a retail marijuana store
is not allowed to retain any portion of the retail marijuana sales tax
collected pursuant to this part 2 to cover the expenses of collecting and
remitting the tax. The executive director OF THE DEPARTMENT may
promulgate ADOPT rules to implement this section.
(b) The maximum tax rate that may be imposed pursuant to this
-8- SB26-161

section is fifteen percent. At any time on or after January 1, 2014, the
general assembly may, by a bill enacted by the general assembly and that
becomes law:
(I) Establish a tax rate to be imposed pursuant to this subsection
(1) that is lower than fifteen percent of the sale of retail marijuana or
retail marijuana products; or
(II) After establishing a tax rate that is lower than fifteen percent
pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), increase the tax rate to
be imposed pursuant to this subsection (1); except that, in no event shall
the general assembly increase the tax rate above fifteen percent of the sale
of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, an increase in the tax rate pursuant to this
subparagraph (II) shall not require voter approval subsequent to the voter
approval required pursuant to part 4 of this article.
(4) (a) (I) THE MAXIMUM SALES TAX THAT MAY BE IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS:
(A) BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2030, TWO CENTS PER MILLIGRAM OF
TOTAL INTOXICATING CANNABINOIDS IN RETAIL CANNABIS PRODUCTS; OR
(B) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2030, FIVE CENTS PER MILLIGRAM
OF TOTAL INTOXICATING CANNABINOIDS IN RETAIL CANNABIS PRODUCTS.
(II) AT ANY TIME ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY MAY, BY A BILL ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND
THAT BECOMES LAW:
(A) ESTABLISH A SALES TAX RATE TO BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (4) THAT IS LOWER THAN THE SALES TAX RATE
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(B) AFTER ESTABLISHING A SALES TAX RATE THAT IS LOWER THAN
-9- SB26-161

THE SALES TAX RATE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
INCREASE THE SALES TAX RATE TO BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (4); EXCEPT THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL NOT
INCREASE THE SALES TAX RATE ABOVE THE SALES TAX RATE DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (4)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION. AN INCREASE IN THE SALES TAX
RATE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II)(B) DOES NOT REQUIRE
VOTER APPROVAL SUBSEQUENT TO THE VOTER APPROVAL REQUIRED TO
ADOPT THIS SUBSECTION (4).
(b) A SALES TAX IS IMPOSED UPON THE SALE OF RETAIL
INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS BY A RETAILER AT THE FOLLOWING
RATES ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027:
(I) FOR EDIBLE RETAIL MARIJUANA PRODUCTS, ONE AND
TWO-TENTHS OF ONE CENT PER MILLIGRAM OF TOTAL INTOXICATING
CANNABINOIDS; AND
(II) FOR INHALED MARIJUANA PRODUCTS MADE WITH MARIJUANA
CONCENTRATE, FOUR-TENTHS OF ONE CENT PER MILLIGRAM OF TOTAL
INTOXICATING CANNABINOIDS;
(III) FOR MARIJUANA PRODUCTS MADE WITH MARIJUANA FLOWER,
FOUR-TENTHS OF ONE CENT PER MILLIGRAM OF TOTAL INTOXICATING
CANNABINOIDS; AND
(IV) FOR INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS NOT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTIONS (4)(b)(I) TO (4)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION, FOUR-TENTHS OF
ONE CENT PER MILLIGRAM OF TOTAL INTOXICATING CANNABINOIDS.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-203, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
39-28.8-203. Disposition of collections - definitions.
(1) The proceeds of all money collected from the retail marijuana
-10- SB26-161

sales tax are initially credited to the old age pension fund created in
section 1 of article XXIV of the state constitution in accordance with
sections 2 (a) and 2 (f) of article XXIV of the state constitution and
thereafter are transferred to the general fund in accordance with section
7 of article XXIV of the state constitution. For each STATE fiscal year in
which a tax is collected pursuant to this part 2, an amount shall be FORTY
PERCENT OF THE TAX REVENUE IS DISTRIBUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 39-28.8-305 AND SIXTY PERCENT OF THE TAX REVENUE IS
appropriated or distributed from the general fund as follows:
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-302, amend
(1)(a); and add (1)(d) and (1)(e) as follows:
39-28.8-302. Retail marijuana - excise tax levied at first
transfer from retail marijuana cultivation facility - tax rate.
(1) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) or
(1)(c) of this section AND PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2027, there is levied and
shall be collected, in addition to the sales tax imposed pursuant to part 1
of article 26 of this title 39 and part 2 of this article 28.8, a tax on the first
sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana
cultivation facility, at a rate of fifteen percent of the average market rate
of the unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between affiliated
retail marijuana business licensees. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (1)(b) or (1)(c) of this section AND PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2027,
there is levied and shall be collected, in addition to the sales tax imposed
pursuant to part 1 of article 26 of this title 39 and part 2 of this article
28.8, a tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by
a retail marijuana cultivation facility, at a rate of fifteen percent of the
contract price for unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is
-11- SB26-161

between unaffiliated retail marijuana business licensees. Retail marijuana
excise tax shall also be calculated as fifteen percent of the contract price
when the first transfer of retail marijuana that has been harvested for sale
at a retail marijuana store or extraction by a retail marijuana product
manufacturing facility is between unaffiliated retail marijuana cultivation
facilities. The tax shall be imposed at the time when the retail marijuana
cultivation facility first sells or transfers unprocessed retail marijuana
from the retail marijuana cultivation facility to a retail marijuana product
manufacturing facility or a retail marijuana store.
(II) If, for the fiscal year 2014-15, fiscal year spending is greater
than twelve billion eighty million dollars or if the revenue from retail
marijuana taxes is greater than sixty-seven million dollars, then on
September 16, 2015, the rate of the tax imposed under subparagraph (I)
of this paragraph (a) is reduced as specified in section 20 (3)(c) of article
X of the state constitution. On September 17, 2015, in accordance with
paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) and the authority that the voters
conferred through their approval of proposition AA at the November
2013 election, the rate is increased back to fifteen percent.
(d) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b) OR
(1)(c) OF THIS SECTION, A TAX ON THE FIRST SALE OR TRANSFER OF
UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA BY A RETAIL MARIJUANA CULTIVATION
FACILITY IS LEVIED, AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE TAX AT
A RATE OF ONE DOLLAR PER POUND OF UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA.
THE TAX IS IN ADDITION TO THE SALES TAX IMPOSED PURSUANT TO PART
1 OF ARTICLE 26 OF THIS TITLE 39 AND PART 2 OF THIS ARTICLE 28.8.
RETAIL MARIJUANA EXCISE TAX IS CALCULATED AS ONE DOLLAR PER
POUND OF UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA WHEN THE FIRST TRANSFER
-12- SB26-161

OF RETAIL MARIJUANA THAT HAS BEEN HARVESTED FOR SALE AT A RETAIL
MARIJUANA STORE OR EXTRACTION BY A RETAIL MARIJUANA PRODUCT
MANUFACTURING FACILITY IS BETWEEN UNAFFILIATED RETAIL MARIJUANA
CULTIVATION FACILITIES. THE TAX IS IMPOSED WHEN THE RETAIL
MARIJUANA CULTIVATION FACILITY FIRST SELLS OR TRANSFERS
UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA FROM THE RETAIL MARIJUANA
CULTIVATION FACILITY TO A RETAIL MARIJUANA PRODUCT
MANUFACTURING FACILITY OR A RETAIL MARIJUANA STORE.
(e) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ANNUALLY ADJUST FOR INFLATION
THE TAX IMPOSED IN SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION. THE
DEPARTMENT MAY ROUND THE ADJUSTED AMOUNT UPWARD TO THE
NEAREST CENT.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-103, amend
the introductory portion; and add (8.5), (22.7), and (68.3) as follows:
44-10-103. Definitions - rules.
As used in this article 10 AND IN SECTION 25-5-429, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(8.5) "AUTHORIZED SAMPLER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25-5-429 (1)(a).
(22.7) "INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 25-5-429 (1)(c).
(68.3) "SEED-TO-SALE INVENTORY TRACKING SYSTEM" OR
"SEED-TO-SALE TRACKING SYSTEM" MEANS THE TRACKING SYSTEM
DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-202 (1)(a).
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-202, amend
(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(f), and (6); repeal (4); and add (1)(i), (1)(j), and (1)(k)
-13- SB26-161

as follows:
44-10-202. Powers and duties of state licensing authority -
stakeholder work group - rules - report - legislative declaration.
(1) Powers and duties. The state licensing authority shall:
(b) Grant or refuse state licenses for the cultivation, manufacture,
distribution, sale, hospitality, and testing of regulated marijuana and
regulated marijuana INTOXICATING CANNABIS products as provided by
law; suspend, fine, restrict, or revoke such licenses, whether active,
expired, or surrendered, upon a violation of this article 10 or any rule
promulgated ADOPTED pursuant to this article 10; and impose any penalty
authorized by this article 10 or any rule promulgated ADOPTED pursuant
to this article 10. The state licensing authority may take any action with
respect to a registration or permit ISSUED pursuant to this article 10 as it
may with respect to a license ISSUED pursuant to this article 10, in
accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this article 10.
(c) Promulgate ADOPT rules for the proper regulation and control
of the cultivation, manufacture, distribution, AND sale and testing of
regulated marijuana and regulated marijuana OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS
products and for the enforcement of this article 10 and promulgate ADOPT
amended rules and such special rulings and findings as necessary;
(f) Prepare and transmit annually, in the form and manner
prescribed by the heads of the principal departments pursuant to section
24-1-136, a report accounting to the governor for the efficient discharge
of all responsibilities assigned by law or directive to the state licensing
authority; and
(i) PROVIDE FULL READ AND WRITE ACCESS TO THE SEED-TO-SALE
TRACKING SYSTEM TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND
-14- SB26-161

ENVIRONMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPLEMENTING SECTION 25-5-429;
(j) IN THE SEED-TO-SALE TRACKING SYSTEM, PROVIDE ACCESS TO
THE PUBLIC TRACEABILITY INFORMATION AND TESTING RESULTS FOR
INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS OFFERED FOR SALE TO CONSUMERS,
SO THAT A CONSUMER MAY ACCESS AND VIEW PRODUCT BATCHES,
MANUFACTURERS, CULTIVATORS, OR RETAILERS AND THE ASSOCIATED
TRACEABILITY AND TESTING DATA FOR PRODUCTS OFFERED FOR SALE OR
DISTRIBUTION TO THE CONSUMER; AND
(k) ENSURE THAT CONSUMERS CAN USE THE ONLINE PORTAL
ACCESS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(j) OF THIS SECTION TO SEARCH FOR
TRACEABILITY AND TESTING INFORMATION BY PRODUCT BATCHES,
MANUFACTURERS, OR CULTIVATORS.
(4) The executive director of the department of public health and
environment shall provide to the state licensing authority standards for
licensing laboratories pursuant to the requirements as outlined in section
44-10-203 (2)(d)(II) for regulated marijuana and regulated marijuana
products.
(6) The general assembly finds and declares that matters related
to labeling as regulated pursuant to this section and section 44-10-203
(2)(f), packaging as regulated pursuant to this section and section
44-10-203 (3)(b), and testing as regulated pursuant to this section and
section 44-10-203 (2)(d) SECTION 25-5-429 (3)(a) are matters of statewide
concern and the sole regulatory authority for labeling, packaging, and
testing is section 44-10-203 SECTIONS 25-5-429 AND 44-10-203.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-203, amend
(2)(f), (3) introductory portion, (3)(c), and (8); and add (2)(d)(X) and
(10)(d) as follows:
-15- SB26-161

44-10-203. State licensing authority - rules - repeal.
(2) Mandatory rule-making. Rules adopted pursuant to section
44-10-202 (1)(c) must include the following subjects:
(d) (X) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE MARCH
1, 2027.
(f) (I) Labeling requirements for regulated marijuana and
regulated marijuana INTOXICATING CANNABIS products sold by a medical
marijuana business or retail marijuana business that are at least as
stringent as those imposed by section 25-4-1614 (3)(a) and include: but
are not limited to:
(I) (A) Warning labels;
(II) (B) Amount of THC per serving and the number of servings
per package for regulated marijuana INTOXICATING CANNABIS products;
(III) (C) A universal symbol indicating that the package contains
marijuana; and
(IV) (D) Potency of the regulated marijuana and regulated
marijuana INTOXICATING CANNABIS products.
(II) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT, REQUIRE
THAT ALL INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS OFFERED FOR SALE
INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING CONTENT CLAIMS ON PRODUCT LABELS:
(A) INTENDED USE OF THE PRODUCT;
(B) TOTAL MILLIGRAMS OF THC PER PACKAGE;
(C) TOTAL MILLIGRAMS OF THC PER SERVING;
(D) TOTAL MILLIGRAMS OF OTHER INTOXICATING CANNABINOIDS;
(E) TOTAL MILLIGRAMS OF NONINTOXICATING CANNABINOIDS;
AND
-16- SB26-161

(F) STATEMENTS VERIFYING THE ABSENCE OF MICROBIAL
CONTAMINANTS, AEROBIC CONTAMINANTS, AND RESIDUAL PESTICIDES AT
REGULATED THRESHOLDS.
(3) In promulgating ADOPTING rules pursuant to this section, the
state licensing authority may seek the assistance of the department of
public health and environment when necessary before promulgating
ADOPTING rules on the following subjects:
(c) (I) The safe and lawful transport of regulated marijuana and
regulated marijuana products between the licensed business and testing
laboratories.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE MARCH 1,
2027.
(8) The state licensing authority shall treat a metered-dose inhaler
the same as a vaporized delivery device for purposes of regulation. and
testing.
(10) (d) THIS SUBSECTION (10) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE MARCH 1,
2027.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-204, amend
(2)(a), (2)(c), and (2)(d); and add (2)(e) as follows:
44-10-204. Confidentiality.
(2) The state licensing authority shall make available for public
inspection:
(a) Documents related to final agency actions and orders,
INCLUDING ORDERS TO SHOW CAUSE AND EXHIBITS REFERENCED IN THE
ORDERS, WITH PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION RELATED TO THE
AFFECTED CUSTOMER REDACTED;
(c) Demographic information related to applicants and licensees
-17- SB26-161

available on an aggregated and de-identified basis; and
(d) Enforcement forms and compliance checklists; AND
(e) ADVERSE HEALTH REPORTS, INCLUDING INFORMATION RELATED
TO THE PRODUCT MANUFACTURER AND BASIS FOR THE REPORT, WITH
PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION RELATED TO THE AFFECTED
CUSTOMER REDACTED.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-501, amend
(3)(e) and (6) as follows:
44-10-501. Medical marijuana store license.
(3) (e) (I) A medical marijuana store that sells a hemp product
shall ensure that the hemp product has passed all testing required by rules
adopted by the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203
(2)(d). Prior to taking possession of the A hemp product, a medical
marijuana store shall verify the hemp product passed all testing required
for medical marijuana products at a licensed medical marijuana testing
facility and that the person transferring the hemp product has received a
registration from the department of public health and environment
pursuant to section 25-5-427 OR 25-5-429.
(II) Absent sampling and testing standards established by the
department of public health and environment for the sampling and testing
of a hemp product, a person transferring a hemp product to a medical
marijuana store pursuant to this section shall comply with sampling and
testing standards consistent with those established by the state licensing
authority pursuant to this article 10. The state licensing authority shall
report to the department of public health and environment any
investigations or findings of violations of this section by a person
registered pursuant to section 25-5-427.
-18- SB26-161

(6) (a) FOR FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING PURPOSES, AN
AUTHORIZED SAMPLER SHALL COLLECT A SAMPLE OF AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT FROM A MEDICAL MARIJUANA STORE AND SUBMIT THE
COLLECTED SAMPLE TO A LICENSED MEDICAL MARIJUANA TESTING
FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25-5-429 (6).
(b) A medical marijuana store may provide except as required by
section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a LICENSED MEDICAL
MARIJUANA TESTING facility that has a medical marijuana testing facility
license from the state licensing authority for testing and research
purposes. A medical marijuana store shall maintain a record of what was
provided to the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the
results of the testing.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-502, amend
(3); and repeal (5)(d)(III) as follows:
44-10-502. Medical marijuana cultivation facility license -
centralized distribution permit - obtaining genetic material - transfer
and change of designation of retail marijuana to medical marijuana
- contingency plan - rules - definitions.
(3) (a) FOR FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING PURPOSES, AN
AUTHORIZED SAMPLER SHALL COLLECT A SAMPLE OF AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT FROM A MEDICAL MARIJUANA CULTIVATION FACILITY
AND SUBMIT THE COLLECTED SAMPLE TO A LICENSED MEDICAL MARIJUANA
TESTING FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT
TO SECTION 25-5-429 (6).
(b) A medical marijuana cultivation facility may provide except
as required by section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a
-19- SB26-161

facility that has a LICENSED medical marijuana testing facility license
from the state licensing authority for testing and research purposes. A
medical marijuana cultivation facility shall maintain a record of what was
provided to the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the
testing results.
(5) (d) To provide an R-and-D unit, the R-and-D unit must be:
(III) Tested in accordance with the rules adopted under section
44-10-203 (2)(d);
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-503, amend
(5)(b) and (8); and repeal (10)(d)(III) as follows:
44-10-503. Medical marijuana products manufacturer license
- hemp products - R-and-D units - transfer and change of designation
of retail marijuana to medical marijuana - rules - definition.
(5) (b) (I) A medical marijuana products manufacturer that uses
a hemp product as an ingredient in a medical marijuana product shall
ensure that the hemp product has passed all testing required by rules
adopted by the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203
(2)(d). Prior to taking possession of the A hemp product, a medical
marijuana products manufacturer shall verify the hemp product passed all
testing required for medical marijuana products at a licensed medical
marijuana testing facility and that the person transferring the hemp
product has received a registration from the department of public health
and environment pursuant to section 25-5-427 OR 25-5-429.
(II) Absent sampling and testing standards established by the
department of public health and environment for the sampling and testing
of a hemp product, a person transferring a hemp product to a medical
marijuana products manufacturer pursuant to this section shall comply
-20- SB26-161

with sampling and testing standards consistent with those established by
the state licensing authority pursuant to this article 10. The state licensing
authority shall report to the department of public health and environment
any investigations or findings of violations of this section by a person
registered pursuant to section 25-5-427.
(8) (a) FOR FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING PURPOSES, AN
AUTHORIZED SAMPLER SHALL COLLECT A SAMPLE OF AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT FROM A MEDICAL MARIJUANA PRODUCTS
MANUFACTURER AND SUBMIT THE COLLECTED SAMPLE TO A LICENSED
MEDICAL MARIJUANA TESTING FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES
ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-5-429 (6).
(b) A medical marijuana products manufacturer may provide
except as required by section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products
to a facility that has a LICENSED medical marijuana testing facility license
from the state licensing authority for testing and research purposes. A
medical marijuana products manufacturer shall maintain a record of what
was provided to the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and
the results of the testing.
(10) (d) To provide an R-and-D unit, the R-and-D unit must be:
(III) Tested in accordance with the rules adopted under section
44-10-203 (2)(d);
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-505, amend
(3) as follows:
44-10-505. Medical marijuana transporter license - definition.
(3) A medical marijuana transporter licensee shall use the
seed-to-sale tracking system developed pursuant to section 44-10-202
(1)(a) to create shipping manifests documenting the transport of medical
-21- SB26-161

marijuana and medical marijuana products throughout the state.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-601, amend
(3)(c) and (4) as follows:
44-10-601. Retail marijuana store license - rules - definitions.
(3) (c) (I) A retail marijuana store that sells a hemp product shall
ensure that the hemp product has passed all testing required by rules
adopted by the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203
(2)(d). Prior to taking possession of the A hemp product, a retail
marijuana store shall verify the hemp product passed all testing required
for retail marijuana products at a licensed retail marijuana testing facility
and that the person transferring the hemp product has received a
registration from the department of public health and environment
pursuant to section 25-5-427 OR 25-5-429.
(II) Absent sampling and testing standards established by the
department of public health and environment for the sampling and testing
of a hemp product, a person transferring a hemp product to a retail
marijuana store pursuant to this section shall comply with sampling and
testing standards consistent with those established by the state licensing
authority pursuant to this article 10. The state licensing authority shall
report to the department of public health and environment any
investigations or findings of violations of this section by a person
registered pursuant to section 25-5-427.
(4) (a) FOR FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING PURPOSES, AN
AUTHORIZED SAMPLER SHALL COLLECT A SAMPLE OF AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT FROM A RETAIL MARIJUANA STORE AND SUBMIT EACH
COLLECTED SAMPLE TO A LICENSED RETAIL MARIJUANA TESTING FACILITY.
(b) A retail marijuana store may provide except as required by
-22- SB26-161

section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a facility that has a
LICENSED RETAIL marijuana testing facility license from the state licensing
authority for testing and research purposes. A retail marijuana store shall
maintain a record of what was provided to the testing facility, the identity
of the testing facility, and the results of the testing.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-602, amend
(4); and repeal (6)(d)(III) as follows:
44-10-602. Retail marijuana cultivation facility license -
R-and-D units - centralized distribution permit - genetic material -
transfer and change of designation of retail marijuana to medical
marijuana - contingency plan - rules - definitions.
(4) (a) FOR FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING PURPOSES, AN
AUTHORIZED SAMPLER SHALL COLLECT A SAMPLE OF AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT FROM A RETAIL MARIJUANA CULTIVATION FACILITY
AND SUBMIT THE COLLECTED SAMPLE TO A LICENSED RETAIL MARIJUANA
TESTING FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25-5-429 (6).
(b) A retail marijuana cultivation facility may provide except as
required by section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a facility
that has a LICENSED retail marijuana testing facility license from the state
licensing authority for testing and research purposes. A retail marijuana
cultivation facility shall maintain a record of what was provided to the
testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the testing results.
(6) (d) To provide an R-and-D unit, the R-and-D unit must be:
(III) Tested in accordance with the rules adopted under section
44-10-203 (2)(d);
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-603, amend
-23- SB26-161

(6) and (11)(a); and repeal (10)(c)(III) as follows:
44-10-603. Retail marijuana products manufacturer license -
rules - definition.
(6) (a) FOR FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING PURPOSES, AN
AUTHORIZED SAMPLER SHALL COLLECT A SAMPLE OF AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT FROM A RETAIL MARIJUANA PRODUCTS
MANUFACTURER AND SUBMIT THE COLLECTED SAMPLE TO A LICENSED
RETAIL MARIJUANA TESTING FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULES
ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-5-429 (6).
(b) A retail marijuana products manufacturer may provide except
as required by section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a
facility that has a LICENSED retail marijuana testing facility license from
the state licensing authority for testing and research purposes. A retail
marijuana products manufacturer shall maintain a record of what was
provided to the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the
results of the testing.
(10) (c) To provide an R-and-D unit, the R-and-D unit must be:
(III) Tested in accordance with the rules adopted under section
44-10-203 (2)(d);
(11) (a) A retail marijuana products manufacturer that uses a
hemp product as an ingredient in a retail marijuana product shall ensure
that the hemp product has passed all testing required by rules adopted by
the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(d). Prior to
taking possession of the A hemp product, a retail marijuana products
manufacturer shall verify that the hemp product passed all testing
required for retail marijuana products at a licensed retail marijuana testing
facility and that the person transferring the hemp product has received a
-24- SB26-161

registration from the department of public health and environment
pursuant to section 25-5-427 OR 25-5-429.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-604, repeal
(2) as follows:
44-10-604. Retail marijuana testing facility license.
(2) The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules pursuant
to its authority in section 44-10-202 (1)(c) related to acceptable testing
and research practices, including but not limited to testing, standards,
quality control analysis, equipment certification and calibration, and
chemical identification and other substances used in bona fide research
methods.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-605, amend
(3) as follows:
44-10-605. Retail marijuana transporter license - definition.
(3) A retail marijuana transporter licensee shall use the
seed-to-sale tracking system developed pursuant to section 44-10-202
(1)(a) to create shipping manifests documenting the transport of retail
marijuana and retail marijuana products throughout the state.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-901, add (8)
as follows:
44-10-901. Suspension - corrective action plans.
(8) (a) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY, UPON REFERRAL BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25-5-429 (7):
(I) MAY REQUIRE A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN AND IMPOSE A
MINIMUM THIRTY-DAY PROBATIONARY OPERATION PERIOD; OR
(II) MAY IMPOSE A LICENSE SUSPENSION OF AT LEAST THIRTY DAYS
-25- SB26-161

BUT NO MORE THAN THREE HUNDRED SIXTY-FIVE DAYS.
(b) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL IMPOSE THE
DISCIPLINE IN THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4 OF
TITLE 24.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-5-427, amend
(5)(a) and (8)(c) as follows:
25-5-427. Classes of hemp-derived compounds and
cannabinoids - definitions - registration required - prohibitions - safe
harbor - rules.
(5) Registration required - regulated hemp facilities -
application - fees - repeal.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2023, and on or before July 1 of each year
thereafter, the owner of a regulated hemp facility shall submit a
registration application to the department UNDER THIS SECTION OR UNDER
SECTION 25-5-429. To submit an application, each hemp manufacturer or
storage facility and each safe harbor manufacturer or storage facility must
pay an annual application fee of one hundred dollars plus any additional
registration fee specified in subsection (5)(b) of this section. Each
registration expires on June 30 of the year for which the registration is
issued, regardless of whether the registration was issued after July 1 for
the year. Notwithstanding that a registration is valid for only a portion of
a fiscal year, the application and registration fee do not change.
(8) Offenses. It is unlawful to engage in or knowingly cause a
person to engage in any of the following acts:
(c) Manufacturing, producing, selling, distributing, or holding for
sale or distribution a hemp product without registering with the
department under this section OR SECTION 25-5-429;
-26- SB26-161

SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-5-429 as
follows:
25-5-429. Intoxicating cannabis products - testing - tracking
- sampling - enforcement - study - legislative declaration - definitions
- rules - repeal.
(1) Definitions. THE DEFINITIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION
44-10-103 APPLY TO THIS SECTION. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "AUTHORIZED SAMPLER" MEANS A PERSON EMPLOYED BY, OR
UNDER CONTRACT WITH, THE DEPARTMENT OR A LICENSED TESTING
FACILITY TO COLLECT COMPLIANCE SAMPLES OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS
PRODUCTS, CONSISTENT WITH THE SAMPLING PROTOCOLS ESTABLISHED BY
THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) "CONTENT DISCREPANCY" MEANS THAT A LABORATORY
ANALYSIS, CONDUCTED THROUGH THE STATE REFERENCE LABORATORY OR
OFF-SHELF SURVEILLANCE TESTING SYSTEM, DEMONSTRATES THAT THE
VERIFIED CANNABINOID CONTENT OR CONTAMINANT CONTENT IN A
SAMPLE EXCEEDS THE ALLOWABLE VARIANCE FROM LABELED CLAIMS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(c) (I) "INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT" MEANS A PRODUCT
INTENDED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION THAT CONTAINS AN INTOXICATING
CANNABINOID.
(II) "INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT" INCLUDES:
(A) REGULATED MARIJUANA PRODUCTS; AND
(B) A HEMP PRODUCT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-5-427 (8)(e)(I)(A)
OR (8)(e)(I)(B).
(III) "INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
-27- SB26-161

(A) AN INDUSTRIAL HEMP FIBER, GRAIN, OR SEED PRODUCT THAT
IS NOT INTENDED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION; OR
(B) A PRODUCT THAT CONTAINS A NONINTOXICATING
CANNABINOID BUT DOES NOT CONTAIN AN INTOXICATING CANNABINOID.
(d) "LICENSED TESTING FACILITY" MEANS A TESTING FACILITY OR
LABORATORY THAT IS LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 44.
(e) "LICENSEE" MEANS A PERSON LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE
10 OF TITLE 44.
(f) "OFF-SHELF SURVEILLANCE TESTING SYSTEM" MEANS THE
OFF-SHELF SURVEILLANCE TESTING SYSTEM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(g) "STATE REFERENCE LABORATORY" MEANS THE REFERENCE
LABORATORY ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS
SECTION.
(h) "TAXES AVOIDED" MEANS THE GREATER OF:
(I) NOTHING; OR
(II) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN TAXES THAT SHOULD HAVE BEEN
ASSESSED AT PURCHASE BASED ON VERIFIED CANNABINOID CONTENT AND
THE TAXES THAT WERE ACTUALLY ASSESSED AT PURCHASE BASED ON
LABELED CANNABINOID CONTENT.
(2) Registration required - intoxicating cannabis
manufacturers - application - fees - rules.
(a) THE DEPARTMENT HAS THE POWERS AND DUTIES TO:
(I) GRANT OR DENY A REGISTRATION ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION
(2)(b) OF THIS SECTION AND TO GRANT OR DENY THE ANNUAL RENEWAL OF
A REGISTRATION;
(II) SUSPEND, DENY, OR REVOKE A REGISTRATION UNDER
-28- SB26-161

CIRCUMSTANCES PRESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION OR IN RULES ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SECTION;
(III) REVIEW THE RECORDS OF A REGISTRANT THAT
MANUFACTURES FOR DISTRIBUTION, PRODUCES FOR DISTRIBUTION,
PACKAGES FOR DISTRIBUTION, PROCESSES FOR DISTRIBUTION, PREPARES
FOR DISTRIBUTION, TREATS FOR DISTRIBUTION, TRANSPORTS FOR
DISTRIBUTION, OR HOLDS FOR DISTRIBUTION PRODUCTS SUBJECT TO THIS
SECTION AS NECESSARY TO VERIFY COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION OR
RULES ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(IV) ADOPT RULES THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR THE FAIR,
IMPARTIAL, AND COMPREHENSIVE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS PART 4 WITH
RESPECT TO INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS;
(V) ISSUE A CEASE-AND-DESIST ORDER OR CLEAN-UP ORDER TO
ADDRESS VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION;
(VI) CONDUCT INSPECTIONS OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT
FACILITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-421 TO ENSURE
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION; AND
(VII) CONDUCT TESTING OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS
AT ANY POINT OF THE SUPPLY CHAIN TO:
(A) ENSURE THAT INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS COMPLY
WITH THIS SECTION OR RULES ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION OR ARTICLE
10 OF TITLE 44 OR RULES ADOPTED UNDER ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 44;
(B) ENSURE THE SAFETY OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS;
(C) DETERMINE THE SOURCE OF CONTAMINANTS; OR
(D) MAKE ANY FINDINGS NECESSARY TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION
OR RULES ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION OR ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 44 OR
RULES ADOPTED UNDER ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 44.
-29- SB26-161

(b) (I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 OF
EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE OWNER OF A BUSINESS THAT PRODUCES OR
INTENDS TO PRODUCE AN INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT SHALL
SUBMIT A REGISTRATION APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT. TO SUBMIT
AN APPLICATION, THE OWNER MUST PAY AN APPLICATION FEE SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION PLUS AN ANNUAL REGISTRATION
FEE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION. EACH
REGISTRATION EXPIRES ON JUNE 30 OF THE YEAR FOR WHICH THE
REGISTRATION IS ISSUED, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE REGISTRATION
WAS ISSUED AFTER JULY 1 FOR THE STATE FISCAL YEAR.
NOTWITHSTANDING THAT A REGISTRATION IS VALID FOR ONLY A PORTION
OF A FISCAL YEAR, THE APPLICATION AND REGISTRATION FEE DO NOT
CHANGE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SET THE APPLICATION FEE TO OFFSET
THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COST OF PROCESSING THE APPLICATIONS FOR
REGISTRATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SET THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE
TO OFFSET THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THIS
SECTION, EXCLUDING PROCESSING THE APPLICATIONS FOR REGISTRATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(c) A REGISTRATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS
SUBJECT TO SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE
4 OF TITLE 24, IF THE REGISTRANT VIOLATES THIS PART 4 OR RULES
ADOPTED UNDER THIS PART 4.
(d) A REGISTRANT THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION OR RULES
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES ESTABLISHED
IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION.
-30- SB26-161

(e) AN INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT PRODUCED BY A
REGISTRANT IS DEEMED NOT ADULTERATED, AS DEFINED IN SECTIONS
25-5-410 AND 25-5-416, UNLESS THE PRODUCT MEETS ONE OR MORE OF
THE CRITERIA FOR ADULTERATION SET FORTH IN SECTION 25-5-410 OR
25-5-416.
(f) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE FEES COLLECTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
WHOLESALE FOOD MANUFACTURING AND STORAGE PROTECTION CASH
FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25-5-426 (5).
(3) Testing - tracking - research and development - rules -
repeal. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(a) [Similar to 44-10-203 (2)(d)(I)] ADOPT RULES ESTABLISHING
AN INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS INDEPENDENT TESTING AND
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM FOR MARIJUANA BUSINESS LICENSEES REQUIRING
INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS BE TESTED TO ENSURE, AT A
MINIMUM, THAT PRODUCTS SOLD FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION DO NOT
CONTAIN CONTAMINANTS, INCLUDING MICROBIAL AND RESIDUAL
SOLVENTS AND CHEMICAL AND BIOLOGICAL CONTAMINANTS, IN AN
AMOUNT THAT IS INJURIOUS TO HEALTH AND TO ENSURE CORRECT
LABELING. THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS APPLY TO TESTING UNDER THE
RULES:
(I) (A) IF TEST RESULTS INDICATE THE PRESENCE OF A SUBSTANCE
IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED TO BE INJURIOUS TO HEALTH, THE RULES
MUST REQUIRE THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA OR RETAIL MARIJUANA TESTING
FACILITY LICENSEE TO IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
(B) [Similar to 44-10-203 (2)(d)(IV)(A)] TESTING MUST ALSO
-31- SB26-161

VERIFY INTOXICATING CANNABINOID POTENCY REPRESENTATIONS AND
HOMOGENEITY FOR CORRECT LABELING AND PROVIDE A CANNABINOID
PROFILE FOR THE INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT.
(C) [Similar to 44-10-203 (2)(d)(VI)] THE RULES MUST INCLUDE
THE PROTOCOLS AND FREQUENCY OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT
TESTING BY AUTHORIZED SAMPLERS.
(D) [Similar to 44-10-203 (2)(d)(VII)] A STATE, LOCAL, OR
MUNICIPAL AGENCY SHALL NOT EMPLOY OR USE THE RESULTS OF A TEST
OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS CONDUCTED BY AN ANALYTICAL
LABORATORY THAT IS NOT ACCREDITED TO THE INTERNATIONAL
ORGANIZATION FOR STANDARDIZATION/INTERNATIONAL
ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION 17025:2005 STANDARD, OR ANY
SUBSEQUENT SUPERSEDING STANDARD, IN THAT FIELD OF TESTING.
(II) (A) IN ADOPTING THE RULES REQUIRED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(3)(a), THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT REQUIRE A LICENSEE TO TEST AN
INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT UNTIL THE PRODUCT IS PACKAGED FOR
RETAIL SALE OR DISTRIBUTION TO CONSUMERS. THIS SUBSECTION
(3)(a)(II)(A) DOES NOT SUPERSEDE THE AUTHORITY GRANTED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(VII) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) A LICENSEE MUST OBTAIN TESTING OF ITS INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCTS AT A LICENSED TESTING FACILITY. THE LICENSED
TESTING FACILITY MAY CHARGE THE LICENSEE TO CONDUCT THE TESTING.
(C) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027, A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC WHO
MAY LEGALLY PURCHASE AN INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT MAY
OBTAIN TESTING OF AN INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCT AT THE STATE
REFERENCE LABORATORY OR A LICENSED TESTING FACILITY. THE STATE
REFERENCE LABORATORY OR LICENSED TESTING FACILITY MAY CHARGE
-32- SB26-161

THE PURCHASER TO CONDUCT THE TESTING.
(b) USE THE SEED-TO-SALE TRACKING SYSTEM TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION;
(c) [Similar to 44-10-203 (10)(a)] ADOPT RULES TO ENABLE A
LICENSEE TO CONDUCT RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT USING R-AND-D
UNITS WHEN EVALUATING DIFFERENT FLAVORS AND NONMARIJUANA
INGREDIENTS, BUT A LICENSEE SHALL NOT TRANSFER R-AND-D UNITS TO
A REGULATED MARIJUANA STORE;
(d) ADOPT RULES MAKING THE FOLLOWING AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC
INSPECTION VIA AN ONLINE PORTAL:
(I) ADVERSE HEALTH REPORTS, INCLUDING INFORMATION RELATED
TO THE PRODUCT MANUFACTURER AND BASIS FOR THE REPORT, WITH
PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION RELATED TO AN AFFECTED
CUSTOMER REDACTED;
(II) TEST RESULTS OF ALL PRODUCTS SOLD TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(III) DATA CONTAINED IN THE SEED-TO-SALE TRACKING SYSTEM;
EXCEPT THAT THE DATA MUST BE PROVIDED IN AN AGGREGATE FORM WITH
NO PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION OR WITH PERSONALLY
IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION RELATED TO AN AFFECTED CUSTOMER
REDACTED; AND
(e) (I) ADOPT THE RULES DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3) ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2027. UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT ADOPTS THE RULES
DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3), ALL RULES AND ORDERS OF THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY CONTINUE TO BE EFFECTIVE AND SHALL BE
ENFORCED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNTIL SUPERSEDED, AMENDED,
REPEALED, OR NULLIFIED PURSUANT TO LAW.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(e) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
-33- SB26-161

(4) Off-shelf surveillance testing system.
(a) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY, SHALL ESTABLISH AND OPERATE A STATEWIDE
OFF-SHELF SURVEILLANCE TESTING SYSTEM FOR INTOXICATING CANNABIS
PRODUCTS THAT INCLUDES:
(I) SAMPLING OF PRODUCTS PACKAGED FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION
TO CONSUMERS;
(II) VALIDATING CONTENT CLAIMS TO PROTECT CONSUMER
HEALTH AND SAFETY;
(III) DETECTION OF CONTAMINANTS IN AMOUNTS DETERMINED TO
BE INJURIOUS TO HEALTH;
(IV) PUBLISHING PRODUCT-LEVEL TRACEABILITY AND TESTING
DATA; AND
(V) MANDATING IMMEDIATE CORRECTIVE ACTION.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE THE TESTING SYSTEM FOR
CONTENT CLAIMS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION
OPERATIONAL ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ESTABLISH THE IMPLEMENTATION TIME FRAME FOR THE CONTAMINANT
TESTING REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (4)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION, BUT THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL IMPLEMENT CONTAMINANT TESTING BY JANUARY 1,
2030. CONTAMINANT TESTING MAY BE PHASED IN OVER THE COURSE OF
TWELVE TO EIGHTEEN MONTHS TO ACCOMMODATE LABORATORY
CAPACITY AND REGULATORY ALIGNMENT.
(5) State reference laboratory. ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027,
THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY, SHALL ESTABLISH A REFERENCE LABORATORY FOR
INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS THAT:
-34- SB26-161

(a) MAINTAINS VALIDATED METHODS AND BENCHMARKS;
(b) PROVIDES OR VALIDATES REFERENCE MATERIALS OR
PROFICIENCY SAMPLES;
(c) SUPPORTS ALIGNMENT CHECKS BETWEEN LICENSED TESTING
FACILITIES AND THE STATE REFERENCE LABORATORY;
(d) PROVIDES SURVEILLANCE TESTING SERVICES TO THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(e) OFFERS, FOR A FEE, TESTING SERVICES TO THE PUBLIC.
(6) Authorized sampling - rules. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
RULES REGARDING THE SAMPLING OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS
AT RETAIL. THE RULES MUST INCLUDE:
(a) MINIMUM TRAINING AND DOCUMENTATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
AN AUTHORIZED SAMPLER;
(b) REQUIREMENTS FOR CHAIN OF CUSTODY AND SAMPLE
HANDLING;
(c) METHODS FOR ENSURING REPRESENTATIVENESS OF SAMPLES;
(d) ENFORCEMENT MECHANISMS FOR NONCOMPLIANCE WITH
SAMPLING REQUIREMENTS; AND
(e) THE SAFE AND LAWFUL TRANSPORT OF INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCTS BETWEEN A LICENSED BUSINESS AND A TESTING
LABORATORY.
(7) Labeling and content claim requirements - enforcement -
penalties.
(a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENFORCE LABELING REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SECTION
44-10-203 (2)(f) AND ANY ADDITIONAL CONTENT CLAIM REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY RULE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
-35- SB26-161

(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TEST FOR:
(I) LABELING DISCREPANCIES INVOLVING AN INTOXICATING
CANNABINOID OR A NONINTOXICATING CANNABINOID; OR
(II) CONTAMINANT LEVELS IN AN INTOXICATING CANNABIS
PRODUCT THAT EXCEED ALLOWABLE THRESHOLDS FOR AN INTOXICATING
CANNABIS PRODUCT.
(c) IF TESTING DEMONSTRATES A DISCREPANCY OR
CONTAMINATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION OR A
FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THE RULES ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (3) OF
THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) ORDER AN IMMEDIATE QUARANTINE OF THE UNSOLD PRODUCTS
FROM THE PRODUCTION BATCH;
(II) AUTHORIZE THE LICENSEE TO RELABEL A QUARANTINED
PRODUCT TO REFLECT THE ACTUAL CONTENT, AND THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REMOVE THE QUARANTINE ON APPROPRIATELY RELABELED
PRODUCTS;
(III) ORDER THE DESTRUCTION OF PRODUCTS THAT CONTAIN
CONTAMINANT LEVELS EXCEEDING ALLOWABLE THRESHOLDS FOR
INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCTS;
(IV) ISSUE A PUBLIC RECALL NOTICE AND ORDER AFFECTED RETAIL
LOCATIONS TO POST SIGNAGE AT THE AFFECTED RETAIL LOCATIONS;
(V) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY ON THE LICENSEE IN AN AMOUNT:
(A) AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED PERCENT
OF TAXES AVOIDED DUE TO INACCURATE LABELING OR TEN PERCENT OF
THE TOTAL RETAIL VALUE OF THE PRODUCTS SOLD TO CONSUMERS; AND
(B) NOT MORE THAN EQUAL TO THE GREATER OF TWENTY-FIVE
THOUSAND DOLLARS OR THE TOTAL RETAIL VALUE OF THE PRODUCTS SOLD
-36- SB26-161

TO CONSUMERS; AND
(VI) (A) REFER THE VIOLATION TO THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY FOR A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN AND PROBATIONARY
OPERATION PERIOD ORDERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-901 (8); OR
(B) REFER THE VIOLATION TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
FOR A LICENSE SUSPENSION ORDERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-901
(8).
(d) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES THAT:
(I) CLASSIFY THE DISCREPANCIES OR CONTAMINATIONS DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION OR FAILURES TO COMPLY WITH THE
RULES ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) SETS THE APPROPRIATE ORDERS AND PENALTIES AUTHORIZED
IN SUBSECTION (7)(c) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH CLASSIFICATION
CREATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION IN
ORDER TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
(e) EXCEPT FOR A REFERRAL TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(c)(VI) OF THIS SECTION, DISCIPLINARY
PROCEEDINGS, HEARINGS, AND OPPORTUNITY FOR REVIEW MUST BE
CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24. TO PROTECT
CONSUMER SAFETY, THE FILING OF AN APPEAL DOES NOT STAY A
QUARANTINE OR RECALL ORDER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(8) Enforcement - violations.
(a) UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES, A COUNTY, A DISTRICT
CREATED UNDER ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 32, A MUNICIPALITY, OR A CITY AND
COUNTY SHALL NOT PERFORM A FOOD SAFETY INSPECTION AT A PREMISES
REGISTERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(b) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION, A
-37- SB26-161

PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION, THE RULES ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SECTION, OR A FINAL CEASE-AND-DESIST ORDER OR CLEAN-UP ORDER IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IN AN AMOUNT UP TO TEN THOUSAND
DOLLARS PER DAY PER VIOLATION.
(c) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT CIVIL PENALTIES
IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE WHOLESALE FOOD MANUFACTURING
AND STORAGE PROTECTION CASH FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25-5-426
(5).
SECTION 24. Applicability. This act applies to conduct
occurring on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 25. Refer to people under referendum. At the
election held on November 3, 2026, the secretary of state shall submit this
act by its ballot title to the registered electors of the state for their
approval or rejection. Each elector voting at the election may cast a vote
either "Yes/For" or "No/Against" on the following ballot title: "SHALL
STATE TAXES BE INCREASED $___ ANNUALLY BY A CHANGE TO THE
COLORADO REVISED STATUTES AMENDING EXISTING LAW
CONCERNING CANNABIS-RELATED PRODUCTS, AND, IN CONNECTION
THEREWITH, CHANGING THE BASIS FOR MARIJUANA EXCISE AND SALES
TAXES FROM A PERCENTAGE OF PRICE TO THE AMOUNT OF
INTOXICATING CANNABIS CONTENT, MOVING THE TESTING AND SAFETY
ELEMENTS OF INTOXICATING CANNABIS REGULATION FROM THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
AND ENVIRONMENT, REQUIRING INTOXICATING CANNABIS PRODUCERS
TO BE REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND
ENVIRONMENT, AND CHANGING THE TESTING OF MARIJUANA." Except
as otherwise provided in section 1-40-123, Colorado Revised Statutes, if
-38- SB26-161

a majority of the electors voting on the ballot title vote "Yes/For", then
the act will become part of the Colorado Revised Statutes.
-39- SB26-161